Connecticut, session 2026, HB05123.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
twenty thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Office of Policy and Management for the purpose of providing a grant-
in-aid to the town of Plymouth for the implementation of a cloud-based
filing system.